Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62Q.46, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Infants, children, and adolescents. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 2, a health plan company is prohibited from imposing cost-sharing requirements with respect to an office visit if: new text end new text begin (1) the primary purpose of the visit is to provide infants, children, and adolescents with evidence-informed preventive care and screenings identified in comprehensive guidelines supported by the Health Resources and Services Administration; and new text end new text begin (2) the office visit is 15 minutes or less in duration. new text end new text begin (b) If an office visit meets the requirements of paragraph (a), a health plan company must not prohibit a health care provider from billing for preventive items or services that are billed separately or tracked separately as individual encounter data. new text end